Illinois, session 104th, SB1049.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Economic Development Project Area Tax 5Increment Allocation Act of 1995 is amended by changing 6Section 1 as follows: 7    (65 ILCS 110/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Economic Development Project Area Tax Increment Allocation Act 10of 1995.11(Source: P.A. 89-176, eff. 1-1-96.)